Idaho, session 2025, S1151.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 45, Title 41, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 45
IDAHO TRAVEL INSURANCE ACT
41-4501. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Idaho Travel Insurance Act."
41-4502. PURPOSE. (1) The purpose of this chapter is to promote the
public welfare by creating a comprehensive legal framework within which
travel insurance may be sold in this state.
(2) The requirements of this chapter apply to travel insurance that
covers any resident of this state and that is sold, solicited, negotiated,
or offered in this state and to certificates that are delivered or issued
for delivery in this state. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to
cancellation fee waivers or travel assistance services, except as expressly
provided in this chapter.
(3) All other applicable provisions of the insurance laws in this state
shall continue to apply to travel insurance, except that the specific pro-


visions of this chapter shall supersede any general provisions of law that
would otherwise be applicable to travel insurance.
41-4503. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Aggregator site" means a website that provides access to informa-
tion regarding insurance products from more than one (1) insurer, including
product and insurer information, for use in comparison shopping.
(2) "Blanket travel insurance" means a policy of travel insurance is-
sued to any eligible group providing coverage for specific classes of per-
sons defined in the policy with coverage provided to all members of the eli-
gible group without a separate charge to individual members of the eligible
group.
(3) "Cancellation fee waiver" means a contractual agreement between a
supplier of travel services and its customer to waive some or all of the non-
refundable cancellation fee provisions of the supplier's underlying travel
contract with or without regard to the reason for the cancellation or form of
reimbursement. A cancellation fee waiver is not insurance.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of insurance.
(5) "Eligible group" means, solely for the purposes of travel insur-
ance, two (2) or more persons who are engaged in a common enterprise or have
an economic, educational, or social affinity or relationship, including but
not limited to:
(a) Any entity engaged in the business of providing travel or travel
services, wherein with regard to any particular travel or type of travel
or travelers, all members or customers of the group have a common expo-
sure to risk attendant to such travel. Such entities include but are not
limited to tour operators, lodging providers, vacation property own-
ers, hotels and resorts, travel clubs, travel agencies, property man-
agers, cultural exchange programs, and common carriers or the opera-
tor, owner, or lessor of a means of transportation of passengers, such
as airlines, cruise lines, railroads, steamship companies, and public
bus carriers;
(b) Any college, school, or other institution of learning covering any
group of students, teachers, employees, or volunteers;
(c) Any employer covering any group of employees, volunteers, contrac-
tors, board of directors, dependents, or guests;
(d) Any sports team, camp, or sponsor thereof, covering any group of
participants, members, campers, employees, officials, supervisors, or
volunteers;
(e) Any religious, charitable, recreational, educational, or civic or-
ganization, or branch thereof, covering any group of members, partici-
pants, or volunteers;
(f) Any financial institution or financial institution vendor, or any
parent holding company, trustee, or agent or designee of one (1) or more
financial institutions or financial institution vendors, including
account holders, credit card holders, debtors, guarantors, or pur-
chasers;
(g) Any incorporated or unincorporated association, including labor
unions, having a common interest, constitution, and bylaws, and orga-
nized and maintained in good faith for purposes other than obtaining


insurance for members or participants of such association covering its
members;
(h) Any trust or the trustees of a fund established, created, or main-
tained for the benefit of and covering a group of members, employees, or
customers, subject to the director's permitting the use of a trust and
the state's premium tax provisions set forth in section 41-4504, Idaho
Code, of one (1) or more associations meeting the requirements of para-
graph (g) of this subsection;
(i) Any entertainment production company covering any group of partic-
ipants, volunteers, audience members, contestants, or workers;
(j) Any volunteer fire department, or volunteer ambulance, rescue, po-
lice, court, first aid, civil defense, or other such volunteer group;
(k) Any preschool, daycare institution for children or adults, or se-
nior citizen club;
(l) Any automobile or truck rental or leasing company covering a group
of individuals who may become renters, lessees, or passengers defined
by their travel status on the rented or leased vehicles. The common car-
rier, the operator, owner, or lessor of a means of transportation, or
the automobile or truck rental or leasing company, is the policyholder
under a policy to which this section applies; or
(m) Any other group where the director has determined that the members
are engaged in a common enterprise, or have an economic, educational, or
social affinity or relationship, and that issuance of the policy would
not be contrary to the public interest.
(6) "Fulfillment materials" means documentation sent to the purchaser
of a travel protection plan confirming the purchase and providing the travel
protection plan's coverage and assistance details.
(7) "Group travel insurance" means travel insurance issued to any eli-
gible group.
(8) "Limited lines travel insurance producer" has the meaning provided
in section 41-1091, Idaho Code.
(9) "Primary certificate holder" means an individual who elects and
purchases travel insurance under a group policy.
(10) "Primary policyholder" means an individual who elects and pur-
chases individual travel insurance.
(11) "Travel administrator" means a person who directly or indirectly
underwrites, collects charges, collateral, or premiums from, or adjusts or
settles claims on residents of this state, in connection with travel insur-
ance, except that a person shall not be considered a travel administrator if
that person's actions that would otherwise cause the person to be considered
a travel administrator are limited to:
(a) A person working for a travel administrator to the extent that the
person's activities are subject to the supervision and control of the
travel administrator;
(b) An insurance producer selling insurance or engaged in administra-
tive and claims-related activities within the scope of the producer's
license;
(c) A travel retailer offering and disseminating travel insurance and
registered under the license of a limited lines travel insurance pro-
ducer in accordance with this chapter;


(d) An individual adjusting or settling claims in the normal course of
that individual's practice or employment as an attorney at law and who
does not collect charges or premiums in connection with insurance cov-
erage; or
(e) A business entity that is affiliated with a licensed insurer while
acting as a travel administrator for the direct and assumed insurance
business of an affiliated insurer.
(12) "Travel assistance services" means non-insurance services for
which the consumer is not indemnified based on a fortuitous event and where
providing the service does not result in transfer or shifting of risk that
would constitute the business of insurance. Travel assistance services in-
clude but are not limited to security advisories, destination information,
vaccination and immunization information services, travel reservation ser-
vices, entertainment, activity and event planning, translation assistance,
emergency messaging, international legal and medical referrals, medical
case monitoring, coordination of transportation arrangements, emergency
cash transfer assistance, medical prescription replacement assistance,
passport and travel document replacement assistance, lost luggage as-
sistance, concierge services, and any other service that is furnished in
connection with planned travel. Travel assistance services are not insur-
ance and not related to insurance.
(13) "Travel insurance" has the meaning provided in section 41-1091,
Idaho Code.
(14) "Travel protection plans" means plans that provide travel insur-
ance, travel assistance services, or cancellation fee waivers.
(15) "Travel retailer" has the meaning provided in section 41-1091,
Idaho Code.
41-4504. PREMIUM TAX. (1) A travel insurer shall pay a premium tax, as
provided in section 41-402, Idaho Code, on travel insurance premiums paid
by:
(a) An individual primary policyholder who is a resident of this state;
(b) A primary certificate holder who is a resident of this state and who
elects coverage under a group travel insurance policy; or
(c) A blanket travel insurance policyholder that is a resident of this
state or that has its principal place of business in this state or whose
affiliate or subsidiary has its principal place of business in this
state, which policyholder has purchased blanket travel insurance in
this state for eligible blanket group members.
(2) A travel insurer shall:
(a) Document the state of residence or principal place of business of
the policyholder or certificate holder, as required in subsection (1)
of this section; and
(b) Report as premiums only the amount allocable to travel insurance
and not any amounts received for travel assistance services or cancel-
lation fee waivers.
41-4505. TRAVEL PROTECTION PLANS. Travel protection plans may be of-
fered for one (1) price for the combined features that the travel protection
plan offers in this state if:


(1) The travel protection plan clearly discloses to the consumer, at
or prior to the time of purchase, that it includes travel insurance, travel
assistance services, and cancellation fee waivers, as applicable, and pro-
vides information and an opportunity, at or prior to the time of purchase,
for the consumer to obtain additional information regarding the features and
pricing of each; and
(2) The fulfillment materials:
(a) Describe and delineate the travel insurance, travel assistance
services, and cancellation fee waivers in the travel protection plan;
and
(b) Include the travel insurance disclosures and the contact informa-
tion for persons providing travel assistance services and cancellation
fee waivers, as applicable.
41-4506. SALES PRACTICES. (1) All persons offering travel insurance
to residents of this state are subject to the provisions of chapter 13, title
41, Idaho Code, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. In the event of
a conflict between the provisions of this chapter and other provisions of ti-
tle 41, Idaho Code, regarding the sale and marketing of travel insurance and
travel protection plans, the provisions of this chapter shall control.
(2) Offering or selling a travel insurance policy that could never re-
sult in payment of any claims for any insured under the policy is consid-
ered illusory travel insurance and constitutes an unfair or deceptive act
or practice prohibited pursuant to the provisions of chapter 13, title 41,
Idaho Code.
(3) With regard to marketing practices:
(a) All documents provided to consumers prior to the purchase of travel
insurance, including but not limited to sales materials, advertising
materials, and marketing materials, shall be consistent with the travel
insurance policy itself, including but not limited to forms, endorse-
ments, policies, rate filings, and certificates of insurance.
(b) For travel insurance policies or certificates that contain preex-
isting condition exclusions, information and an opportunity to learn
more about the preexisting condition exclusions shall be provided any
time prior to the time of purchase and in the coverage's fulfillment ma-
terials.
(c) The fulfillment materials and the information described in sec-
tion 41-1092(2)(a), Idaho Code, shall be provided to a policyholder
or certificate holder as soon as practicable following the purchase
of a travel protection plan. Unless the insured has either started a
covered trip or filed a claim under the travel insurance coverage, a
policyholder or certificate holder may cancel a policy or certificate
for a full refund of the travel protection plan price from the date of
purchase of a travel protection plan until at least:
(i) Fifteen (15) days following the date the fulfillment mate-
rials are sent by postal mail to the policyholder or certificate
holder; or
(ii) Ten (10) days following the date the fulfillment materials
are sent by electronic means or personally handed to the policy
holder or certificate holder.


(d) The company shall disclose in the policy documentation and fulfill-
ment materials whether the travel insurance is primary or secondary to
other applicable coverage.
(e) Where travel insurance is marketed directly to a consumer through
an insurer's website or by others through an aggregator site, it shall
not be an unfair or deceptive act or practice or other violation of law
for the website to provide an accurate summary or short description of
coverage, as long as the consumer has access to the full provisions of
the policy through electronic means.
(4) No person offering, soliciting, or negotiating travel insurance or
travel protection plans on an individual or group basis may do so by using
negative option or opt out, which would require a consumer to take an affir-
mative action to deselect coverage, such as unchecking a box on an electronic
form, at the time the consumer purchases a trip.
(5) It shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice to market blanket
travel insurance coverage as free.
(6) Where a consumer's destination jurisdiction requires insurance
coverage, it shall not be an unfair or deceptive act or practice to require
that the consumer choose between the following options as a condition of
purchasing a trip or travel package:
(a) Purchasing the coverage required by the destination jurisdiction
through the travel retailer or limited lines travel insurance producer
supplying the trip or travel package; or
(b) Agreeing to obtain and provide proof of coverage that meets the des-
tination jurisdiction's requirements prior to departure.
41-4507. TRAVEL ADMINISTRATORS. (1) Notwithstanding any other provi-
sions of this title, no person shall act or represent itself as a travel ad-
ministrator for travel insurance in this state unless that person:
(a) Is a licensed property and casualty insurance producer in this
state for activities permitted under that producer license; or
(b) Holds a valid managing general agent license in this state.
(2) A travel administrator and its employees are exempt from the li-
censing requirement set forth in section 41-1103, Idaho Code, for travel in-
surance it administers.
(3) An insurer is responsible for the acts of a travel administrator ad-
ministering travel insurance underwritten by the insurer and is responsible
for ensuring that the travel administrator maintains all books and records
relevant to the insurer, which shall be made available by the travel adminis-
trator to the director upon request.
41-4508. POLICY. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this ti-
tle, and except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, travel insur-
ance shall be classified and filed for purposes of rates and forms under an
inland marine line of insurance.
(2) Travel insurance may be filed under either an accident and health
line of insurance or an inland marine line of insurance if it provides cov-
erage for sickness, accident, disability, or death occurring during travel,
whether exclusively or in conjunction with related coverages of emergency
evacuation or repatriation of remains.


(3) Travel insurance may be in the form of an individual, group, or
blanket policy.
(4) Eligibility and underwriting standards for travel insurance may be
developed and provided based on travel protection plans designed for indi-
vidual or identified marketing or distribution channels, if those standards
also meet the state's underwriting standards for inland marine lines of in-
surance.
41-4509. RULES. In accordance with this chapter and section 41-211,
Idaho Code, the director may promulgate rules, subject to legislative ap-
proval, as are necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this chap-
ter.
SECTION 2. That Section 41-1090, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-1090. SHORT TITLE. Sections 41-1090 through 41-1096 41-1092, Idaho
Code, shall be known and may be cited as the "Limited Lines Travel Insurance
Act."
SECTION 3. That Section 41-1091, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-1091. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Designated responsible producer" means the individual licensed
producer responsible for ensuring compliance by the limited lines travel in-
surance producer with travel insurance laws and rules of the state, as set
forth in section 41-1092(2)(c), Idaho Code.
(2) "Limited lines travel insurance producer" means a person who is a
limited lines producer as defined in section 41-1003, Idaho Code.:
(a) Licensed managing general agent; or
(b) Licensed insurance producer, including a limited lines producer as
defined in section 41-1003, Idaho Code.
(3) "Offer and disseminate" means providing general information, in-
cluding a description of the coverage and price, as well as processing the
application, collecting premiums, and performing other activities permit-
ted by the state.
(4)(a) "Travel insurance" means insurance coverage for personal risks
incident to planned travel including, but not limited to:
(a) (i) Interruption or cancellation of a trip or event;
(b) (ii) Loss of baggage or personal effects;
(c) (iii) Damages to accommodations or rental vehicles; and
(d) (iv) Sickness, accident, disability or death occurring during
travel.;
(v) Emergency evacuation;
(vi) Repatriation of remains; or
(vii) Any other contractual obligations to indemnify or pay a
specified amount to the traveler upon determinable contingencies
related to travel as approved by the director.
(b) "Travel insurance" does not include major medical plans that pro-
vide comprehensive medical protection for travelers with trips lasting


six (6) months or longer, including those working overseas as an expa-
triate or military personnel being deployed, or any other product that
requires a specific insurance producer license.
(5) "Travel retailer" means a business entity that makes, arranges or
offers travel services and may offer and disseminate travel insurance as a
service to its customers on behalf of and under the direction of a limited
lines travel insurance producer.
SECTION 4. That Section 41-1092, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-1092. REQUIREMENTS FOR LIMITED LINES TRAVEL INSURANCE PRODUC-
ERS. Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(1) The director may issue to an individual or business entity that has
filed with the director an application, in a form and manner prescribed by
the director, a limited lines travel insurance producer license that autho-
rizes the limited lines travel insurance producer to sell, solicit or nego-
tiate travel insurance on behalf of a licensed insurer. No person may act as
a limited lines travel insurance producer or travel retailer unless properly
licensed or registered, respectively.
(2) A travel retailer may offer and disseminate travel insurance under
a limited lines travel insurance producer's business entity license only if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The limited lines travel insurance producer or travel retailer pro-
vides to policyholders purchasers of travel insurance:
(i) A description of the material terms or the actual material
terms of the insurance coverage;
(ii) A description of the process for filing a claim;
(iii) A description of the review or cancellation process for the
travel insurance policy, including any forfeiture fees; and
(iv) The identity and contact information of the insurer and lim-
ited lines travel insurance producer.
(b) At the time of licensure, the limited lines travel insurance pro-
ducer shall establish and maintain a register on a form prescribed by
the director of each travel retailer that offers travel insurance on
the limited lines travel insurance producer's behalf. The register
shall be maintained and updated annually, at a minimum, by the limited
lines travel insurance producer and shall include the name, address,
and contact information of the travel retailer and an officer or person
who directs or controls the travel retailer's operations, as well as the
travel retailer's federal tax identification number. The limited lines
travel insurance producer shall submit such register from the previous
year to the department on March 1 of each year. The limited lines travel
insurance producer shall also certify that the registered travel re-
tailer complies with 18 U.S.C. 1033. The limited lines travel insurance
producer shall report its Idaho annual written premium to the direc-
tor on an annual basis. The grounds for suspension and revocation and
the penalties applicable to insurance producers set forth in sections
41-1016 and 41-1026, Idaho Code, shall apply to the limited lines travel
insurance producers and travel retailers.


(c) The limited lines travel insurance producer has designated one (1)
of its employees, who is a licensed individual producer, as a designated
responsible producer who shall be responsible for the limited lines
travel insurance producer's compliance with the travel insurance laws,
rules and regulations of the state.
(d) The designated responsible producer, president, secretary, trea-
surer and any other officer or person who directs or controls the lim-
ited lines travel insurance producer's insurance operations shall com-
ply with the fingerprinting requirements applicable to insurance pro-
ducers in the resident state of the limited lines travel insurance pro-
ducer.
(e) The limited lines travel insurance producer has paid all applicable
insurance producer licensing fees as set forth in applicable state law.
(f) The limited lines travel insurance producer requires each employee
and authorized representative of the travel retailer whose duties in-
clude offering and disseminating travel insurance to receive a program
of instruction or training that shall be subject to review by the direc-
tor. The training material shall, at a minimum, contain instructions
on the types of insurance offered, ethical sales practices and required
disclosures to prospective customers.
(3) Any travel retailer offering or disseminating travel insurance
shall make available to prospective purchasers brochures or other written
materials that have been approved by the travel insurer. Such materials
shall include information that, at a minimum:
(a) Provides the identity and contact information of the insurer and
the limited lines travel insurance producer;
(b) Explains that the purchase of travel insurance is not required in
order to purchase any other product or service from the travel retailer;
and
(c) Explains that an unlicensed travel retailer is permitted to provide
general information about the insurance offered by the travel retailer,
including a description of the coverage and price, but is not qualified
or authorized to answer technical questions about the terms and condi-
tions of the insurance offered by the travel retailer or to evaluate the
adequacy of the customer's existing insurance coverage.
(4) A travel retailer's employees or authorized representatives who
are not licensed as insurance producers may not:
(a) Evaluate or interpret the technical terms, benefits and conditions
of the offered travel insurance coverage;
(b) Evaluate or provide advice concerning a prospective purchaser's
existing insurance coverage; or
(c) Hold himself or itself out as a licensed insurer, licensed producer
or insurance expert.
(5) A travel retailer and its employees and authorized representatives
whose insurance-related activities are limited to offering and disseminat-
ing travel insurance on behalf of and under the direction of a limited lines
travel insurance producer meeting the conditions set forth in chapter 45,
title 41, Idaho Code, is authorized to perform such activities and to receive
related compensation upon registration by the limited lines travel insur-


ance producer in accordance with the provisions of subsection (2)(b) of this
section.
(6) As the insurer's designee, the limited lines travel insurance pro-
ducer is responsible for the acts of the travel retailer and shall use rea-
sonable means to ensure compliance with this chapter by the travel retailer.
(7) Any person licensed in a major line of authority as an insurance
producer is authorized to sell, solicit, and negotiate travel insurance. A
property and casualty insurance producer is not required to become appointed
by an insurer in order to sell, solicit, or negotiate travel insurance.
SECTION 5. That Section 41-1093, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 41-1094, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Section 41-1095, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 8. That Section 41-1096, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 9. That Section 41-1097, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 10. That Section 41-1003, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-1003. DEFINITIONS. (1) "Business entity" means a corporation, as-
sociation, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability part-
nership or other legal entity.
(2) "Home state" means the District of Columbia and any state or terri-
tory of the United States or any province of Canada in which an insurance pro-
ducer maintains his or her principal place of residence or principal place of
business and is licensed to act as an insurance producer.
(3) "License" means a document issued by the director authorizing a
person to act as an insurance producer for the lines of authority specified
in the document. The license itself does not create any authority, actual,
apparent or inherent, in the holder to represent or commit an insurance car-
rier.
(4) "Limited lines insurance" is insurance which restricts the author-
ity of the license to less than the total authority prescribed in the as-
sociated major lines pursuant to section 41-1008(1)(a) through (g), Idaho
Code, and shall include, but not be limited to: credit life, credit disabil-
ity, credit property, credit unemployment, involuntary unemployment, mort-
gage life, mortgage guaranty, mortgage disability, guaranteed automobile
protection (GAP) insurance, transportation baggage insurance, transporta-
tion ticket policies covering personal accident insurance, pet insurance,
portable electronics insurance, travel insurance or any other line of insur-
ance that the director deems necessary to recognize for the purposes of com-
plying with section 41-1009(5), Idaho Code.


(5) "Limited lines producer" means a producer authorized by the direc-
tor to sell, solicit or negotiate limited lines insurance. "Limited lines
producer" includes a "limited lines travel insurance producer" as used in
sections 41-1090 through 41-1096, Idaho Code.
(6) "Negotiate" means the act of conferring directly with or offering
advice directly to a purchaser or prospective purchaser of a particular con-
tract of insurance concerning any of the substantive benefits, terms or con-
ditions of the contract, provided that the person engaged in the act either
sells insurance or obtains insurance from insurers for purchasers.
(7) "Person" means an individual or a business entity.
(8) "Producer" means a person required to be licensed under the laws of
this state to sell, solicit or negotiate insurance.
(9) "Resident" means a person whose home state is Idaho or any other
particular state identified in conjunction with the use of the term.
(10) "Sell" means to exchange a contract of insurance by any means, for
money or its equivalent, on behalf of an insurance company.
(11) "Solicit" means attempting to sell insurance or asking or urging a
person to apply for a particular kind of insurance from a particular company
or companies.
(12) "Terminate" means the cancellation of the relationship between an
insurance producer and the insurer or the termination of a producer's au-
thority to transact insurance for or on behalf of an insurer.
(13) "Uniform application" means the current version of the national
association of insurance commissioners (NAIC) uniform application for resi-
dent and nonresident producer licensing.
(14) "Uniform business entity application" means the current version of
the NAIC uniform business entity application for resident and nonresident
business entities.
SECTION 11. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.